Hawaii statutes.
§122A-6 Discipline. (a) The
discipline of the Hawaii state defense force shall, to the extent practicable,
conform to that of the Hawaii army national guard.

(b) When in the active service of the Hawaii
state defense force, members of the Hawaii state defense force are subject to
chapter 124A. Members are deemed to be in the active service of the Hawaii
state defense force from the date and time specified in any order lawfully
calling them into such service. [L 1987, c 35, pt of §1; am L 1988, c 135, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next